Utah statutes.
13-16-3.   Requirement to establish and disclose "transfer prices" and
"posted rack prices."
A refiner engaged in commerce in this state is required to:
(1)  establish:
(a)  its transfer price on all grades of motor fuel sold to itself or an
affiliate for resale in this state at a different marketing level of
distribution; and
(b)  a posted rack price on all grades of motor fuel the refiner or other
person sells at the rack in this state; and
(2)  at the request of the attorney general, disclose to the attorney general:
(a)  any transfer price described in Subsection (1)(a); or
(b)  any posted rack price described in Subsection (1)(b).
